Utah statutes.
9-8-803.   Ownership of reposited materials -- Rebuttable presumption.

(1)  There is established a rebuttable presumption that any reposited materials held by a collecting institution are the property of that collecting institution.

(2)  Any person seeking to claim reposited materials from a collecting institution shall comply with the requirements of this part.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1993 General Session

